Alabama, session 2026rs, HB582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 8-33-2, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§8-33-2
Page 1

"§8-33-2
As used in this chapter, the following words shall have
the following meanings:
(1) ADMINISTRATOR. A third party other than the
warrantor who is designated by the warrantor to be responsible
for the administration of vehicle protection product
warranties.
(2) COMMISSIONER. The Commissioner of the Department of
Insurance.
(3) DEPARTMENT. The Department of Insurance.
(4) INCIDENTAL COSTS. Expenses specified in the
warranty incurred by the warranty holder related to the
failure of the vehicle protection product to perform as
provided in the warranty. Incidental costs may include,
without limitation, insurance policy deductibles, rental
vehicle charges, the difference between the actual value of
the stolen vehicle at the time of theft and the cost of a
replacement vehicle, sales taxes, registration fees,
transaction fees, and mechanical inspection fees.
(5) SERVICE CONTRACT. A contract or agreement as
defined in subdivision (13) of Section 8-32-2.
(6) VEHICLE PROTECTION PRODUCT. a. A vehicle protection
device, system, or service that is all of the following:
a.1. Installed on or applied to a vehicle.
b.2. Is designed to prevent loss or damage to a vehicle
from a specific cause.
c.3. Includes a written warranty.
b. For purposes of this chapter, the term vehicle
protection product shall include, without limitation, alarm
Page 2

protection product shall include, without limitation, alarm
systems,; body part marking products,; steering locks,; window
etch products,; pedal and ignition locks,; fuel and ignition
kill switches,; catalytic converter marking products; and
electronic, radio, and satellite tracking devices. A vehicle
protection product is not insurance for any purpose.
(7) VEHICLE PROTECTION PRODUCT WARRANTOR or WARRANTOR.
A person who is contractually obligated to the warranty holder
under the terms of the vehicle protection product warranty
agreement. Warrantor does not include an authorized insurer
providing a warranty reimbursement insurance policy.
(8) VEHICLE PROTECTION PRODUCT WARRANTY or WARRANTY. A
written agreement by a warrantor that provides if the vehicle
protection product fails to prevent loss or damage to a
vehicle from a specific cause, that the warranty holder shall
be paid specified incidental costs by the warrantor as a
result of the failure of the vehicle protection product to
perform pursuant to the terms of the warranty. Incidental
costs may be reimbursed under the provisions of the warranty
in either a fixed amount specified in the warranty or sales
agreement or by use of a formula itemizing specific incidental
costs incurred by the warranty holder.
(9) WARRANTY HOLDER. The person who purchases a vehicle
protection product or who is a permitted transferee.
(10) WARRANTY REIMBURSEMENT INSURANCE POLICY. A policy
of insurance that is issued to the vehicle protection product
warrantor to provide reimbursement to the warrantor or to pay
on behalf of the warrantor all covered contractual obligations
incurred by the warrantor under the terms and conditions of
Page 3

incurred by the warrantor under the terms and conditions of
the insured vehicle protection product warranties sold by the
warrantor."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4